North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-55 Commission on Uniform State Laws

54-55-01.
Commission on uniform state laws — Membership.

The commission on uniform state laws consists of an individual engaged in the practice of law in this state, the dean or a full-time member of the faculty of the law school of the university of North Dakota, a law-trained judge of a court of record in this state, a member of the house of representatives and a member of the senate of the legislative assembly, and a member of the legislative council. The attorney general may appoint a member of the commission. The commission also consists of any residents of this state who, because of long service in the cause of uniformity of state legislation, have been elected life members of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws, and may also consist of any residents of this state who have been previously appointed to at least five years of service on the commission. Except for the member appointed by the attorney general, the members of the legislative assembly, the member of the legislative council, and life members, commissioners must be appointed by the governor for terms of four years each, commencing on the first day of September following each presidential election, and shall serve until their respective successors are appointed. Commissioners first appointed after July 21, 2011, must be residents of the state. The members of the legislative assembly on the commission must be appointed by the legislative management for a term not to exceed four years as prescribed by the legislative management, and the member of the legislative council must be appointed by the chairman of the legislative management. The term of the member appointed by the attorney general may not extend beyond the term of that attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 553, § 1; 1987, ch. 662, § 1; 1995, ch. 536, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 82; 2011, ch. 437, § 1; 2015, ch. 426, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 426, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Law Reviews.

Article: The Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act: “Desirable And Practicable” For North Dakota? 87 N.D. L. Rev. 325 (2011).

54-55-02.
Vacancies.

The office of any appointed commissioner becomes vacant upon death, resignation, or failure or refusal to serve. The appointing authority shall make an appointment to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the former appointee.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 553, § 2.

54-55-03.
Meeting and organization.

The commissioners shall meet at least once each two-year period and shall organize by electing one of their number as chairman and another as secretary. The chairman and secretary shall hold their respective offices for a term of two years and until their successors are elected.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 553, § 3.

54-55-04.
Duties of commissioners and commission.

Each commissioner shall attend the annual meeting of the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws and shall promote uniformity in state laws on those subjects where uniformity may be deemed desirable and practicable. The commission shall also promote as far as practicable the uniform judicial application and construction of all uniform state laws. During the interim between legislative sessions, the commission may submit its recommendations for enactment of uniform and model laws to the legislative management for its review and recommendation. Commissioners shall provide such assistance to the legislative management as the legislative management requests with respect to its review of uniform and model laws. During each biennial legislative session, and at any other time as the commission may deem proper, the commission shall report to the legislative assembly an account of its transactions and its advice and recommendations for legislation. The report must include the recommendations of the legislative management with respect to uniform and model laws recommended by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 553, § 4; 1985, ch. 576, § 2; 1991, ch. 600, § 15; 2009, ch. 482, § 83.

54-55-05.
No compensation for commissioners.

The commissioners shall serve without compensation for services as commissioners. The commissioners who are appointed to the commission and the commissioners who have been elected life members of the national conference, except those who are appointed by virtue of having served five years on the commission but who have not served at least twenty years in the legislative assembly, are entitled to be reimbursed, from moneys appropriated for that purpose, for necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties at the rates provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09. Warrant-checks for expense reimbursement must be prepared by the office of management and budget upon vouchers submitted by the commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 553, § 5; 1987, ch. 662, § 2; 1999, ch. 147, § 2.